Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
703

GENERAL
PRINCIPLES OF JUSTIFICATION

Section

703-300 Definitions relating to justification

703-301 Justification a defense; civil remedies
unaffected

703-302 Choice of evils

703-303 Execution of public duty

703-304 Use of force in self-protection

703-305 Use of force for the protection of other
persons

703-306 Use of force for the protection of
property

703-307 Use of force in law enforcement

703-308 Use of force to prevent suicide or the
commission of

a crime

703-309 Use of force by persons with special
responsibility

for care, discipline, or safety of
others

703-310 Provisions generally applicable to
justification

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next